Udmurt.aff
SFX g 0 осызъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осмыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 остыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 оссыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёсыя [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсыдъя [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсызъя [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсмыя [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёстыя [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёссыя [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсын [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п. + местн.п.
SFX g 0 осын [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёсын [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыным [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п.
SFX g 0 ъёсынымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыныд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыныды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсыныз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 ъёсынызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX g 0 осыным [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осынымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осыныд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осыныды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осыныз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 осынызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX g 0 ёсыным [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсынымы [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсыныд [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсыныды [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсыныз [ьъй]
SFX g 0 ёсынызы [ьъй]
