Udmurt.dic
Алагир/g
Арбаж/g
Ачайваям/g
Баргузин/g
Бердигестях/g
Богучар/g
Буй/g
Верховажье/g
Волжский/g
Выселки/g
Горно-Алтайск/g
Дальнее/g
Доваторовка/g
Елец/g
Жиздра/g
Заостровье/g
Знаменка/g
Ильинско-Подомское/g
Казань/g
Кандалакша/g
Качканар/g
Кириллов/g
Козловка/g
Корнево/g
Красногородское/g
Крылово/g
Куркино/g
Ленинск/g
Луговское/g
Малмыж/g
Мезень/g
Монастырщина/g
Навля/g
Нестеров/g
Новоегорьевское/g
Ногинск/g
Олеово/g
Остров/g
Пено/g
Пикалево/g
Покрышкино/g
Приморье/g
Раевский/g
Ртищево/g
Саргатское/g
Семилуки/g
Соболево/g
Спас-Клепики/g
Суксун/g
Тамбов/g
Тикси/g
Трубачевск/g
Удомля/g
Усть-Джегута/g
Февральское/g
Холмы/g
Черемхово/g
Чусовой/g
Шербакуль/g
Южноуральск/g
Ярославское/g
Аглаида/g
Алана/g
Альберто/g
Андрюха/g
Араик/g
Аста/g
Божена/g
Варфоломей/g
Вилли/g
Власта/g
Гаяне/g
Горазд/g
Данила/g
Димитрий/g
Евлампий/g
Жерар/g
Иван/g
Инесса/g
Июлий/g
Катерина/g
Корнелий/g
Лаура/g
Лида/g
Любим/g
Мансур/g
Матильда/g
Михей/g
Настя/g
Ноябрина/g
Отто/g
Пров/g
Рафик/g
Розалия/g
Самсон/g
Селина/g
Спиридон/g
Танюша/g
Туллий/g
Филарет/g
Чеслав/g
Эмилиан/g
Юлий/g
Авенирович/g
Алановна/g
Амирханович/g
Антонинович/g
Арсениевич/g
Ахмадовна/g
Булатовна/g
Вергилиевич/g
Владиленовна/g
Гамлетович/g
Гертовна/g
Данияровна/g
Донатовна/g
Ермакович/g
Ибрагимович/g
Ильясович/g
Казбекович/g
Климентиевич/g
Ксенофонтович/g
Леонтиевич/g
Мамедовна/g
Милославович/g
Назимович/g
Нурбекович/g
Павловна/g
Протасовна/g
Рашидович/g
Рудольфович/g
Саркисовна/g
Сильвестровна/g
Тамерланович/g
Трифоновна/g
Филипповна/g
Эдгардовна/g
Эрикович/g
Ясиновна/g
Аберкина/g
Абросименкова/g
Аверкина/g
Агаев/g
Адашкин/g
Азина/g
Акинин/g
Акулова/g
Алексашкина/g
Алиев/g
Алферьев/g
Амелин/g
Ангелов/g
Андросов/g
Аниханова/g
Анпилов/g
Антурьев/g
Апекишев/g
Ардуанов/g
Арсенов/g
Арукаева/g
Астапов/g
Аухаренок/g
Ахметзянова/g
Бабанина/g
Бабушкин/g
Баданин/g
Базанов/g
Байдаков/g
Байметов/g
Бакланова/g
Балакирева/g
Балуев/g
Баньков/g
Барбосов/g
Барсук/g
Басараб/g
Батеев/g
Батькова/g
Бахошкина/g
Башкирцев/g
Бедарев/g
Безлепкина/g
Бекряшева/g
Белесова/g
Белогуров/g
Белорусова/g
Белявский/g
Березкина/g
Беседина/g
Беченков/g
Бикмаева/g
Бичурина/g
Бляшенко/g
Бобылева/g
Богомаз/g
Бодренков/g
Бойнов/g
Болотова/g
Борбылева/g
Борисюк/g
Боровцов/g
Бортников/g
Бочаков/g
Боярина/g
Братищев/g
Брилина/g
Брызгунов/g
Бубякина/g
Будилова/g
Буйнов/g
Булатов/g
Бунегина/g
Бурдюгина/g
Бурнин/g
Бусыева/g
Бухаметов/g
Быданов/g
Бычковская/g
Вакундиков/g
Валовщикова/g
Варганова/g
Варначева/g
Васильцова/g
Ватаева/g
Вдовытченко/g
Величко/g
Веремьев/g
Верхоламов/g
Вешняков/g
Винограденко/g
Вишнев/g
Водомерова/g
Войнов/g
Волов/g
Волошкин/g
Ворожбянова/g
Ворфоломеев/g
Вошкин/g
Выползов/g
Вяткин/g
Гаврилов/g
Гаевой/g
Гайнутдинова/g
Галимзянова/g
Галушко/g
Гамонова/g
Гараев/g
Гаркушова/g
Гвоздева/g
Гереев/g
Гильмаев/g
Гирбасова/g
Гледяев/g
Глушенко/g
Гнидкина/g
Гойдина/g
Голионова/g
Головкина/g
Голотовский/g
Голушков/g
Гомонова/g
Горбанева/g
Гордеев/g
Горкун/g
Горожанкин/g
Горшечников/g
Гостева/g
Гребеников/g
Грецов/g
Гривкова/g
Гринченко/g
Гришунова/g
Грушина/g
Гугало/g
Гуйда/g
Гуменников/g
Гурко/g
Гусятников/g
Давтян/g
Данильченкова/g
Дахина/g
Дворянская/g
Дёгтева/g
Деменков/g
Денежкина/g
Деркачев/g
Дзюина/g
Дмитрук/g
Добрынина/g
Долбня/g
Должикова/g
Донгузова/g
Доронова/g
Дранкова/g
Дроздов/g
Дряблова/g
Дубогрызова/g
Дудукало/g
Дуплев/g
Дурянова/g
Дымова/g
Дятлов/g
Евсигнеев/g
Еглевский/g
Еламкова/g
Елфимова/g
Емельяшенков/g
Еремейцева/g
Ермолаева/g
Ерышев/g
Ефимова/g
Жаравин/g
Жевнина/g
Желобков/g
Жерлицын/g
Жиделев/g
Жириков/g
Жуйкова/g
Забалуев/g
Забуга/g
Загнетов/g
Зажигин/g
Закаржевская/g
Замараев/g
Занчарова/g
Зарифуллин/g
Затулина/g
Заходякина/g
Звягинцев/g
Земляной/g
Зигаев/g
Зиньков/g
Зноев/g
Зорина/g
Зубовская/g
Зыкова/g
Зятева/g
Иванникова/g
Ивашкова/g
Игнатова/g
Идылбаев/g
Илатовская/g
Ильминская/g
Ионина/g
Искакова/g
Ишбулдин/g
Каберов/g
Кадров/g
Казин/g
Калагаева/g
Калиниченко/g
Кальницкий/g
Камилянов/g
Кандабарова/g
Капитолинина/g
Карабутова/g
Карачев/g
Карелина/g
Кармазина/g
Карпов/g
Карханина/g
Кастрыкин/g
Катрушенко/g
Качула/g
Каюров/g
Кельматова/g
Киевский/g
Кириенкова/g
Кирпиченков/g
Кислинский/g
Клавкин/g
Клепинин/g
Клипин/g
Клюбанов/g
Кнышенко/g
Ковалевская/g
Ковкова/g
Кожевников/g
Козий/g
Козьменко/g
Колачева/g
Колесниченко/g
Колодочкин/g
Колпащиков/g
Коляго/g
Комолова/g
Кондратьева/g
Кононова/g
Коньков/g
Копица/g
Копьёва/g
Коржев/g
Корнеенкова/g
Коровикова/g
Коротаева/g
Корчевой/g
Косачева/g
Костенко/g
Костромицкий/g
Косычева/g
Котова/g
Кочерин/g
Кошелевская/g
Кравченков/g
Красавцев/g
Краснопёрова/g
Крахмалева/g
Кречетов/g
Кривошеева/g
Криушечева/g
Кругликов/g
Крупнов/g
Кручинин/g
Ксензов/g
Кувалдин/g
Кудрявцева/g
Кузовенко/g
Куковенко/g
Кулева/g
Кульминский/g
Кунникова/g
Куракова/g
Курзенкова/g
Курмаев/g
Куртова/g
Кусаинова/g
Кутлубаева/g
Кухтикова/g
Кучумов/g
Кюннап/g
Лаврут/g
Лазебный/g
Лантратова/g
Ларикова/g
Латышев/g
Леваков/g
Левусенкова/g
Леденев/g
Леоненкова/g
Лесняк/g
Ливенцев/g
Липасова/g
Листопадов/g
Лихачев/g
Лобко/g
Лодочников/g
Ломаченкова/g
Лопушкова/g
Лошкарёва/g
Лужанов/g
Лукоянов/g
Лутай/g
Лыгин/g
Лытнева/g
Лютов/g
Ляпшин/g
Мазалова/g
Майданов/g
Маклакова/g
Макуров/g
Маликов/g
Малошонок/g
Мамаева/g
Манапов/g
Манчук/g
Маринина/g
Мартынова/g
Масалаева/g
Масюков/g
Матросов/g
Махмудов/g
Мачкарин/g
Медведев/g
Меледин/g
Менгафаров/g
Мерзликин/g
Метелёва/g
Мигалкин/g
Милитдинова/g
Минаев/g
Минкайдаров/g
Мираева/g
Митронин/g
Митянин/g
Михашин/g
Мишнева/g
Можаев/g
Мокин/g
Молоченкова/g
Моренков/g
Мосенков/g
Мостов/g
Мотыль/g
Музиянов/g
Муратшина/g
Мусаев/g
Мухина/g
Мысякина/g
Мякшина/g
Наволоцкий/g
Нажимов/g
Налесник/g
Насибуллин/g
Невзорова/g
Нежнова/g
Немилый/g
Несветаев/g
Нефедов/g
Низамутдинова/g
Никичкина/g
Никонорова/g
Новинская/g
Ноздрачева/g
Ночевка/g
Обойщиков/g
Овсянникова/g
Однорогова/g
Оксененко/g
Ольшанская/g
Опякина/g
Осанушков/g
Ососков/g
Осьмаков/g
Ощепков/g
Падалко/g
Пальченко/g
Пантелеев/g
Папуша/g
Пархомов/g
Патекин/g
Пахоменков/g
Пейчев/g
Пенченков/g
Перевозчикова/g
Перепечаева/g
Перун/g
Пестряков/g
Петроченко/g
Петушкова/g
Пивников/g
Пилюков/g
Пискажов/g
Пищулина/g
Плетникова/g
Плюснин/g
Погодин/g
Подволоцкий/g
Подойницын/g
Подъельных/g
Покоева/g
Полежаев/g
Половнева/g
Полупанова/g
Поляков/g
Понасенков/g
Попченко/g
Посадова/g
Потапенкова/g
Потоцкая/g
Прачкин/g
Придацкая/g
Приходкин/g
Прокопьев/g
Проскурина/g
Проценкова/g
Прялкова/g
Пудов/g
Пулькина/g
Пустовойтенко/g
Пучканёва/g
Пчелов/g
Пышной/g
Работягова/g
Разгоняев/g
Разумова/g
Распутина/g
Рахманина/g
Ревякина/g
Ремов/g
Решитов/g
Рогозина/g
Рождественский/g
Роменская/g
Рощупкина/g
Рудин/g
Рулева/g
Рухлова/g
Рыжакова/g
Рысиков/g
Рябков/g
Ряполова/g
Савеленок/g
Савостина/g
Садовский/g
Сакова/g
Сальников/g
Самойлова/g
Самощенкова/g
Сапарова/g
Сапрученкова/g
Сасов/g
Сахипгареева/g
Светашов/g
Свистельников/g
Севостьянов/g
Секачев/g
Селихов/g
Семенихин/g
Семисорина/g
Сентяков/g
Середа/g
Сероштан/g
Сивенкова/g
Сидоренко/g
Силин/g
Симарев/g
Синицкая/g
Ситнянский/g
Скирева/g
Скопина/g
Скребцов/g
Скубин/g
Слапыгин/g
Слонов/g
Смелкова/g
Смоковдина/g
Смык/g
Снытко/g
Совкова/g
Сократов/g
Солодков/g
Солоненков/g
Сопов/g
Сосунова/g
Сошников/g
Спирин/g
Старапопов/g
Старотоненкова/g
Стаценко/g
Степенко/g
Стефанцова/g
Стопичева/g
Стрельцов/g
Струков/g
Стулихин/g
Суворова/g
Суконкина/g
Сунгуров/g
Сурминова/g
Суфияров/g
Сухорутченко/g
Сырорыбова/g
Тавокин/g
Таначева/g
Тарасенко/g
Татаренко/g
Телегин/g
Темираева/g
Терехина/g
Тертова/g
Тимонова/g
Тихонина/g
Токарь/g
Толстикова/g
Торшинин/g
Тронина/g
Трухина/g
Тульская/g
Турыгин/g
Тютюнник/g
Удодова/g
Урядников/g
Ухинова/g
Фарфорова/g
Федорушкова/g
Филаретов/g
Фирсов/g
Фудашкина/g
Халезова/g
Харламенков/g
Хвостикова/g
Хоботова/g
Хомутинников/g
Хренова/g
Хуснутдинов/g
Цуверкалова/g
Цыхманова/g
Чеботарева/g
Чепурных/g
Черниченко/g
Чеснакова/g
Чигиринова/g
Чубов/g
Чулкова/g
Чушкина/g
Шайбадуллина/g
Шалимов/g
Шангин/g
Шарахматов/g
Шатрова/g
Швыдкин/g
Шейкин/g
Шенцова/g
Шехорин/g
Шинов/g
Шишатская/g
Шлыкина/g
Шонбин/g
Штода/g
Шумарова/g
Шухарева/g
Щепихин/g
Эскерова/g
Юсуфбеков/g
Яковлева/g
Янушевский/g
Яцкая/g
